Ohio, session 136, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.015 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.015. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of state route number one hundred forty-nine between state 9
route three hundred thirty-one and United States route forty, in 10
Belmont county, shall be known as the "Litten Brothers Memorial 11
Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14